Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202287-212
Trade name; assignment; recordation; fee.

Any trade name registered under sections 87-208 to 87-219.01 shall be assignable with the goodwill of the business in which the trade name is used. Assignment shall be by an instrument in writing duly executed, in duplicate, and may be recorded with the Secretary of State upon the payment of a fee of thirty dollars if the filing is submitted in writing and twenty-five dollars if the filing is submitted electronically pursuant to section 84-511. The street address, city, and state of the assignee must be included in the assignment. Upon recording of the assignment, the Secretary of State shall return the duplicate copy stamped with the date of filing to the applicant or the representative submitting the applications for filing. An assignment of any registration under sections 87-208 to 87-219.01 shall be void as against any subsequent purchaser for value without notice unless the assignment is recorded with the Secretary of State prior to the subsequent purchase. The fees imposed under this section shall be payable to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall remit all such fees to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of the fees to the General Fund and forty percent of the fees to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1967, c. 628, § 5, p. 2101;

Laws 1969, c. 856, § 3, p. 3226;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 44.